src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.aff
FLAG long
SFX Ve ordar órdo/XxV3V4 ordar
SFX Ve ordar órdes/XxV7V8 ordar
SFX Ve ordar órdas/XxV7V8 ordar
SFX Ve ordar órde/XxV1V2V3V4 ordar
SFX Ve ordar órden/XxV1V2 ordar
SFX Ve ordar órdan/XxV1V2 ordar
SFX Ve order órdo/XxV3V4 order
SFX Ve order órdas/XxV7V8 order
SFX Ve order órda/XxV1V2V3V4 order
SFX Ve order órdan/XxV1V2 order
SFX Ve ordiar órdio/XxV3V4 ordiar
SFX Ve ordiar órdies/XxV7V8 ordiar
SFX Ve ordiar órdias/XxV7V8 ordiar
SFX Ve ordiar órdie/XxV1V2V3V4 ordiar
SFX Ve ordiar órdien/XxV1V2 ordiar
SFX Ve ordiar órdian/XxV1V2 ordiar
SFX Ve orfar órfo/XxV3V4 orfar
SFX Ve orfar órfes/XxV7V8 orfar
SFX Ve orfar órfas/XxV7V8 orfar
SFX Ve orfar órfe/XxV1V2V3V4 orfar
SFX Ve orfar órfen/XxV1V2 orfar
SFX Ve orfar órfan/XxV1V2 orfar
SFX Ve orfiar órfio/XxV3V4 orfiar
SFX Ve orfiar órfies/XxV7V8 orfiar
SFX Ve orfiar órfias/XxV7V8 orfiar
SFX Ve orfiar órfie/XxV1V2V3V4 orfiar
SFX Ve orfiar órfien/XxV1V2 orfiar
SFX Ve orfiar órfian/XxV1V2 orfiar
SFX Ve orgar órgo/XxV3V4 orgar
SFX Ve orgar órgues/XxV7V8 orgar
SFX Ve orgar órgas/XxV7V8 orgar
SFX Ve orgar órgue/XxV1V2V3V4 orgar
SFX Ve orgar órguen/XxV1V2 orgar
SFX Ve orgar órgan/XxV1V2 orgar
SFX Ve orguiar órguio/XxV3V4 orguiar
SFX Ve orguiar órguies/XxV7V8 orguiar
SFX Ve orguiar órguias/XxV7V8 orguiar
SFX Ve orguiar órguie/XxV1V2V3V4 orguiar
SFX Ve orguiar órguien/XxV1V2 orguiar
SFX Ve orguiar órguian/XxV1V2 orguiar
SFX Ve oriar ório/XxV3V4 oriar
SFX Ve oriar óries/XxV7V8 oriar
SFX Ve oriar órias/XxV7V8 oriar
SFX Ve oriar órie/XxV1V2V3V4 oriar
SFX Ve oriar órien/XxV1V2 oriar
SFX Ve oriar órian/XxV1V2 oriar
SFX Ve orir óro/XxV3V4 orir
SFX Ve orir óras/XxV7V8 orir
SFX Ve orir óra/XxV1V2V3V4 orir
SFX Ve orir óran/XxV1V2 orir
SFX Ve orlar órlo/XxV3V4 orlar
SFX Ve orlar órles/XxV7V8 orlar
SFX Ve orlar órlas/XxV7V8 orlar
SFX Ve orlar órle/XxV1V2V3V4 orlar
SFX Ve orlar órlen/XxV1V2 orlar
SFX Ve orlar órlan/XxV1V2 orlar
SFX Ve ormar órmo/XxV3V4 ormar
SFX Ve ormar órmes/XxV7V8 ormar
SFX Ve ormar órmas/XxV7V8 ormar
SFX Ve ormar órme/XxV1V2V3V4 ormar
SFX Ve ormar órmen/XxV1V2 ormar
SFX Ve ormar órman/XxV1V2 ormar
SFX Ve ormiar órmio/XxV3V4 ormiar
SFX Ve ormiar órmies/XxV7V8 ormiar
SFX Ve ormiar órmias/XxV7V8 ormiar
SFX Ve ormiar órmie/XxV1V2V3V4 ormiar
SFX Ve ormiar órmien/XxV1V2 ormiar
SFX Ve ormiar órmian/XxV1V2 ormiar
SFX Ve ormir órmo/XxV3V4 ormir
SFX Ve ormir órmas/XxV7V8 ormir
SFX Ve ormir órma/XxV1V2V3V4 ormir
SFX Ve ormir órman/XxV1V2 ormir
SFX Ve ornar órno/XxV3V4 ornar
SFX Ve ornar órnes/XxV7V8 ornar
SFX Ve ornar órnas/XxV7V8 ornar
SFX Ve ornar órne/XxV1V2V3V4 ornar
SFX Ve ornar órnen/XxV1V2 ornar
SFX Ve ornar órnan/XxV1V2 ornar
SFX Ve orniar órnio/XxV3V4 orniar
SFX Ve orniar órnies/XxV7V8 orniar
SFX Ve orniar órnias/XxV7V8 orniar
SFX Ve orniar órnie/XxV1V2V3V4 orniar
SFX Ve orniar órnien/XxV1V2 orniar
SFX Ve orniar órnian/XxV1V2 orniar
SFX Ve ornir órno/XxV3V4 ornir
SFX Ve ornir órnas/XxV7V8 ornir
SFX Ve ornir órna/XxV1V2V3V4 ornir
SFX Ve ornir órnan/XxV1V2 ornir
SFX Ve orpar órpo/XxV3V4 orpar
SFX Ve orpar órpes/XxV7V8 orpar
SFX Ve orpar órpas/XxV7V8 orpar
SFX Ve orpar órpe/XxV1V2V3V4 orpar
SFX Ve orpar órpen/XxV1V2 orpar
SFX Ve orpar órpan/XxV1V2 orpar
SFX Ve orpiar órpio/XxV3V4 orpiar
SFX Ve orpiar órpies/XxV7V8 orpiar
SFX Ve orpiar órpias/XxV7V8 orpiar
SFX Ve orpiar órpie/XxV1V2V3V4 orpiar
SFX Ve orpiar órpien/XxV1V2 orpiar
SFX Ve orpiar órpian/XxV1V2 orpiar
SFX Ve orrar órro/XxV3V4 orrar
SFX Ve orrar órres/XxV7V8 orrar
SFX Ve orrar órras/XxV7V8 orrar
SFX Ve orrar órre/XxV1V2V3V4 orrar
SFX Ve orrar órren/XxV1V2 orrar
SFX Ve orrar órran/XxV1V2 orrar
SFX Ve orrer órro/XxV3V4 orrer
SFX Ve orrer órras/XxV7V8 orrer
SFX Ve orrer órra/XxV1V2V3V4 orrer
SFX Ve orrer órran/XxV1V2 orrer
SFX Ve orriar órrio/XxV3V4 orriar
SFX Ve orriar órries/XxV7V8 orriar
SFX Ve orriar órrias/XxV7V8 orriar
SFX Ve orriar órrie/XxV1V2V3V4 orriar
SFX Ve orriar órrien/XxV1V2 orriar
SFX Ve orriar órrian/XxV1V2 orriar
SFX Ve orrir órro/XxV3V4 orrir
SFX Ve orrir órras/XxV7V8 orrir
SFX Ve orrir órra/XxV1V2V3V4 orrir
SFX Ve orrir órran/XxV1V2 orrir
SFX Ve ortar órto/XxV3V4 ortar
SFX Ve ortar órtes/XxV7V8 ortar
SFX Ve ortar órtas/XxV7V8 ortar
SFX Ve ortar órte/XxV1V2V3V4 ortar
SFX Ve ortar órten/XxV1V2 ortar
SFX Ve ortar órtan/XxV1V2 ortar
SFX Ve ortiar órtio/XxV3V4 ortiar
SFX Ve ortiar órties/XxV7V8 ortiar
SFX Ve ortiar órtias/XxV7V8 ortiar
SFX Ve ortiar órtie/XxV1V2V3V4 ortiar
SFX Ve ortiar órtien/XxV1V2 ortiar
SFX Ve ortiar órtian/XxV1V2 ortiar
SFX Ve ortir órto/XxV3V4 ortir
SFX Ve ortir órtas/XxV7V8 ortir
SFX Ve ortir órta/XxV1V2V3V4 ortir
SFX Ve ortir órtan/XxV1V2 ortir
SFX Ve orvar órvo/XxV3V4 orvar
SFX Ve orvar órves/XxV7V8 orvar
SFX Ve orvar órvas/XxV7V8 orvar
SFX Ve orvar órve/XxV1V2V3V4 orvar
SFX Ve orvar órven/XxV1V2 orvar
SFX Ve orvar órvan/XxV1V2 orvar
SFX Ve orviar órvio/XxV3V4 orviar
SFX Ve orviar órvies/XxV7V8 orviar
SFX Ve orviar órvias/XxV7V8 orviar
SFX Ve orviar órvie/XxV1V2V3V4 orviar
SFX Ve orviar órvien/XxV1V2 orviar
SFX Ve orviar órvian/XxV1V2 orviar
SFX Ve orxar órxo/XxV3V4 orxar
SFX Ve orxar órxes/XxV7V8 orxar
SFX Ve orxar órxas/XxV7V8 orxar
SFX Ve orxar órxe/XxV1V2V3V4 orxar
SFX Ve orxar órxen/XxV1V2 orxar
SFX Ve orxar órxan/XxV1V2 orxar
SFX Ve orzar órzo/XxV3V4 orzar
SFX Ve orzar órces/XxV7V8 orzar
SFX Ve orzar órzas/XxV7V8 orzar
SFX Ve orzar órce/XxV1V2V3V4 orzar
SFX Ve orzar órcen/XxV1V2 orzar
SFX Ve orzar órzan/XxV1V2 orzar
SFX Ve osar óso/XxV3V4 osar
SFX Ve osar óses/XxV7V8 osar
SFX Ve osar ósas/XxV7V8 osar
SFX Ve osar óse/XxV1V2V3V4 osar
SFX Ve osar ósen/XxV1V2 osar
SFX Ve osar ósan/XxV1V2 osar
SFX Ve oscar ósco/XxV3V4 oscar
SFX Ve oscar ósques/XxV7V8 oscar
SFX Ve oscar óscas/XxV7V8 oscar
SFX Ve oscar ósque/XxV1V2V3V4 oscar
SFX Ve oscar ósquen/XxV1V2 oscar
SFX Ve oscar óscan/XxV1V2 oscar
SFX Ve oser óso/XxV3V4 oser
SFX Ve oser ósas/XxV7V8 oser
SFX Ve oser ósa/XxV1V2V3V4 oser
SFX Ve oser ósan/XxV1V2 oser
SFX Ve osiar ósio/XxV3V4 osiar
SFX Ve osiar ósies/XxV7V8 osiar
SFX Ve osiar ósias/XxV7V8 osiar
SFX Ve osiar ósie/XxV1V2V3V4 osiar
SFX Ve osiar ósien/XxV1V2 osiar
SFX Ve osiar ósian/XxV1V2 osiar
SFX Ve osmar ósmo/XxV3V4 osmar
SFX Ve osmar ósmes/XxV7V8 osmar
SFX Ve osmar ósmas/XxV7V8 osmar
SFX Ve osmar ósme/XxV1V2V3V4 osmar
SFX Ve osmar ósmen/XxV1V2 osmar
SFX Ve osmar ósman/XxV1V2 osmar
SFX Ve osnar ósno/XxV3V4 osnar
SFX Ve osnar ósnes/XxV7V8 osnar
SFX Ve osnar ósnas/XxV7V8 osnar
SFX Ve osnar ósne/XxV1V2V3V4 osnar
SFX Ve osnar ósnen/XxV1V2 osnar
SFX Ve osnar ósnan/XxV1V2 osnar
SFX Ve ospiar óspio/XxV3V4 ospiar
SFX Ve ospiar óspies/XxV7V8 ospiar
SFX Ve ospiar óspias/XxV7V8 ospiar
SFX Ve ospiar óspie/XxV1V2V3V4 ospiar
SFX Ve ospiar óspien/XxV1V2 ospiar
SFX Ve ospiar óspian/XxV1V2 ospiar
SFX Ve ostar ósto/XxV3V4 ostar
SFX Ve ostar óstes/XxV7V8 ostar
SFX Ve ostar óstas/XxV7V8 ostar
SFX Ve ostar óste/XxV1V2V3V4 ostar
SFX Ve ostar ósten/XxV1V2 ostar
SFX Ve ostar óstan/XxV1V2 ostar
SFX Ve ostiar óstio/XxV3V4 ostiar
SFX Ve ostiar ósties/XxV7V8 ostiar
SFX Ve ostiar óstias/XxV7V8 ostiar
SFX Ve ostiar óstie/XxV1V2V3V4 ostiar
SFX Ve ostiar óstien/XxV1V2 ostiar
SFX Ve ostiar óstian/XxV1V2 ostiar
SFX Ve ostrar óstro/XxV3V4 ostrar
SFX Ve ostrar óstres/XxV7V8 ostrar
SFX Ve ostrar óstras/XxV7V8 ostrar
SFX Ve ostrar óstre/XxV1V2V3V4 ostrar
SFX Ve ostrar óstren/XxV1V2 ostrar
SFX Ve ostrar óstran/XxV1V2 ostrar
SFX Ve otar óto/XxV3V4 otar
SFX Ve otar ótes/XxV7V8 otar
SFX Ve otar ótas/XxV7V8 otar
SFX Ve otar óte/XxV1V2V3V4 otar
SFX Ve otar óten/XxV1V2 otar
SFX Ve otar ótan/XxV1V2 otar
SFX Ve otiar ótio/XxV3V4 otiar
SFX Ve otiar óties/XxV7V8 otiar
SFX Ve otiar ótias/XxV7V8 otiar
SFX Ve otiar ótie/XxV1V2V3V4 otiar
SFX Ve otiar ótien/XxV1V2 otiar
SFX Ve otiar ótian/XxV1V2 otiar
SFX Ve otrar ótro/XxV3V4 otrar
SFX Ve otrar ótres/XxV7V8 otrar
SFX Ve otrar ótras/XxV7V8 otrar
SFX Ve otrar ótre/XxV1V2V3V4 otrar
SFX Ve otrar ótren/XxV1V2 otrar
SFX Ve otrar ótran/XxV1V2 otrar
SFX Ve otriar ótrio/XxV3V4 otriar
SFX Ve otriar ótries/XxV7V8 otriar
SFX Ve otriar ótrias/XxV7V8 otriar
SFX Ve otriar ótrie/XxV1V2V3V4 otriar
SFX Ve otriar ótrien/XxV1V2 otriar
