src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.dic
abatucar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
abobecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
abrir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVm
acaecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acarondiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acercar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acigarrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acometer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acorriyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acumular/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
adobar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afatar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aflanar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afoñicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
agarabanar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
agriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aguyetar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aldar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
allanciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
alloquecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
alzar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amargar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amburientar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amnistiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amortecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
anabar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
angariellar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
anubligar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apandar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apatuxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apelucar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apicaxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aplacar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apopar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apretuxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arnaturriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arrapar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arrechascar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arremendar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arriesgar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arroxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
asedir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
asoletar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
asulpiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atarasconar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aterrenar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atomizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atoñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atropellar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
avinagrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
azulexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
barbullar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
blizcar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cabezar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
calzar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
carpintexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cepar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
chirchar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ciscotiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
comezar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
constar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
corrincar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cuntar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
demandar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desacoxecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desamurniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desatar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
descompaxinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desencabritar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desenronchar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
designar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
despreocupar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
dilingar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
electrizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
emblanquiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empalomar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
emperingotar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enarboliar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encaramanecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enchirolar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encucuruxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enfloriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engarrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engurdir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enoxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ensangrentar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entetexer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enximplar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esbandorgar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esbravetar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escalar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escarbonizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escazarexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escomponguer/XxVeVh st:escomponer
escuchiritiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esfañicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esfuñicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esgorgolexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esmadreñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esmontar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espantar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
especulizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espizolar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esquiciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esterredar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esvaporizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
falopar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
financiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
fraguar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
gallardoniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
goliscar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
gustar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
incher/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
inxuriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
llasiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
lloviscar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
manducar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
mazquiñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
moderar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
nairiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
obsequiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pallabricar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pautar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
peñerar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
plumar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
previr/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
quilmar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rasquetar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
recalar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
reenganchar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rellozar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
repilar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
respiñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
revirar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
romanar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
saniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sintonizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
somantar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
subir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tamborilar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
teorizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
torniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tresbildar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tropar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
valsiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
vomitar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
xistar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
zarpiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
